Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0222.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 473. (1) Not Except as otherwise provided in this section, not less than 14 days before the expiration of an initial, second, or continuing order of for involuntary mental health treatment issued under section 472a or section 485a, a hospital director, or an agency, or mental health professional physician, psychologist, or qualified health professional supervising an individual's assisted outpatient treatment shall file a petition for a second or continuing order of for involuntary mental health treatment if the hospital director or supervisor believes the individual continues to be a person requiring treatment and that the individual is likely to refuse treatment on a voluntary basis when the order expires. The petition shall must contain a statement setting forth the reasons for the hospital director's or supervisor's or their joint determination that the individual continues to be a person requiring treatment, a statement describing the treatment program provided to the individual, the results of that course of treatment program, and a clinical estimate as to of the time further treatment will be required. The petition shall must be accompanied by a both of the following: (a) A clinical certificate executed by a psychiatrist.physician, psychologist, or qualified health professional. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, evidence that the physician, psychologist, or qualified health professional who executed the clinical certificate under subdivision (a) examined the individual subject to the petition and discussed the examination findings and the treatment program for the individual with a psychiatrist during or immediately after the examination. This subdivision does not apply to a physician who is a psychiatrist. (2) Not less than 14 days before the expiration of an initial, second, or continuing order for assisted outpatient treatment issued under section 472a, a hospital director, agency, physician, psychologist, or qualified health professional supervising an individual's assisted outpatient treatment, or an individual 18 years of age or older, may file a petition for a second or continuing order for involuntary mental health treatment if the individual continues to be a person requiring treatment and that the individual is likely to refuse treatment on a voluntary basis when the order expires. The petition must contain a statement setting forth the reason for the determination that the individual continues to be a person requiring treatment, a statement describing the treatment program provided to the individual, the results of that treatment program, and a clinical estimate of the time further treatment will be required. The petition must be accompanied by both of the following: (a) A clinical certificate executed by a physician, psychologist, or qualified health professional. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, evidence that the physician, psychologist, or qualified health professional who executed the clinical certificate under subdivision (a) examined the individual subject to the petition and discussed the examination findings and the treatment program for the individual with a psychiatrist during or immediately after the examination. This subdivision does not apply to a physician who is a psychiatrist. (3) If an individual is subject to an order for involuntary mental health treatment issued under section 472a or section 485a, and a petition for a second or continuing order for involuntary health treatment is filed, the current order for involuntary health treatment shall remain in full force and effect until the pending petition is resolved. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Psychiatric nurse practitioner" means an individual who is licensed as a registered professional nurse under part 172 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17201 to 333.17242, who has been granted a specialty certification as a nurse practitioner by the Michigan board of nursing under section 17210 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17210, and who has training in the area of mental health. (b) "Qualified health professional" means a psychiatric nurse practitioner who is acting under the delegation of a psychiatrist under section 16215 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16215, or a physician's assistant who is acting pursuant to a practice agreement with a psychiatrist under article 15 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16101 to 333.18838.